lrec2010_examples/defaultnom.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Adj +mas +fem +Sg +Pl GUESS

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Adjective ;


LEXICON Noun
<[a|á|Á|b| c| d| e| é|É| f| g| h| i|í|Í| j| k| l| m| n|ñ|Ñ| o|ó|Ó| p| q| r| s| t|u|ú|Ú|ü|Ü|v| w| x| y| z|A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z]*> Ninf;

LEXICON Adjective
<[a|á|Á|b| c| d| e| é|É| f| g| h| i|í|Í| j| k| l| m| n|ñ|Ñ| o|ó|Ó| p| q| r| s| t|u|ú|Ú|ü|Ü|v| w| x| y| z|A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z]*> Adjinf;

LEXICON Ninf
+N+sg:0 #;

+N+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Adjinf
+Adj+sg:0 #;

+Adj+Pl:^s  #;
